Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 9

Contracts, Leases and Lease-Purchase Agreements

7-51-901. Part definitions.

Whenever used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Capital improvement property” means any real or tangible property needed for a governmental purpose and having a useful life of one (1) year or more, and any real or tangible personal property with respect to which capital outlay notes can be legally authorized and issued by a municipality;

“Contracting party” means any party to a contract, lease or lease-purchase agreement other than a municipality, and can include individuals, corporations, partnerships, other government agencies, and other business entities;

“Governing body” means the board or body in which the general legislative powers of the municipality are vested;

“Municipality” means any county or incorporated city or town of the state of Tennessee;

“Notice of meeting” means the notice of meeting referred to in this part; and

“Resolution” means any resolution duly adopted by a governing body pursuant to this part.

Acts 1983, ch. 186, § 1.

Cross-References. Debts of local boards of education, §49-2-204.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

7-51-902. Capital improvement property.

Any municipality is authorized to enter into, with any contracting party or parties, contracts, leases or lease-purchase agreements with respect to capital improvement property for terms not to exceed forty (40) years or the useful life of the subject capital improvement property, whichever is less.

Acts 1983, ch. 186, § 2.

7-51-903. Long-term contracts.

Except as otherwise authorized or provided by law, municipalities are hereby authorized to enter into long-term contracts for such period or duration as the municipality may determine for any purpose for which short-term contracts not extending beyond the term of the members of the governing body could be entered; provided, that §7-51-902 shall govern the periods or terms of contracts, leases, and lease-purchase agreements with respect to capital improvement property.

Acts 1983, ch. 186, § 3.

7-51-904. Approval by governing body — Notice of meeting.

Whenever the period or term, including any renewal term or extension period, of any contract, lease, or lease-purchase agreement for any real property is to be for less than five (5) years, under the authority of § 7-51-902 or § 7-51-903, or for tangible personal property, regardless of the period or term, such contract, lease or lease-purchase agreement shall first be approved by resolution or ordinance duly adopted by the governing body of the municipality, and no such contract, lease, or lease-purchase agreement shall be entered into by a municipality without such approval.

Whenever the period or term, including any renewal term or extension period, of any contract, lease or lease-purchase agreement for any real property is to be for five (5) years or more under the authority of § 7-51-902 or § 7-51-903, a notice of meeting shall be published relative to the meeting at which such contract, lease or lease-purchase agreement will be considered by the governing body of the municipality at least seven (7) days prior to the date set for such meeting. Such notice of meeting shall identify the real property to be considered, the term or terms of such contract, lease or lease-purchase agreement and the contracting party. Such contract, lease or lease-purchase agreement shall be approved by resolution or ordinance adopted by the governing body of the municipality, and no such contract, lease or lease-purchase agreement shall be entered into by a municipality without such approval.

No other or further approval shall be required for any contract, lease or lease-purchase agreement entered into pursuant to this part.

Acts 1983, ch. 186, § 4.

7-51-905. Construction with other laws.

This part shall in no manner repeal, modify, change, or interfere with any general or special statutes pertaining to municipal or county contracts or leases, including, but not limited to, those statutes pertaining to competitive bidding, conflicts of interest, public building authorities, purchasing, issuance of bonds, borrowing of money and incurring of debts, and appropriations.

The authorization provided by this part shall be additional and supplemental to, and the limitations provided in this part shall not affect the powers or authorizations provided by any other law, and is not in substitution for the powers or authorizations conferred by any other law.

Acts 1983, ch. 186, § 5.

7-51-906. Proprietary contracts unaffected.

This part shall not affect the powers of any municipality to contract in its proprietary capacity.

Acts 1983, ch. 186, § 6.

7-51-907. Sewage treatment works and public water systems.

Pursuant to the terms of this part, any municipality is hereby authorized to lease, lease-purchase and/or contract for the construction operation or management of capital improvement property that is all or part of “sewage treatment works” as defined in §68-221-201, or a “public water system” as defined in §68-221-703.

Acts 1983, ch. 186, § 7.

7-51-908. Contracts concerning education.

Municipalities, counties, or school systems may contract among themselves for matters concerning education.

Acts 1983, ch. 186, § 8.

7-51-909. Tax exemption for capital improvement property.

Any contract, lease or lease-purchase agreement with respect to capital improvement property entered into under the authority of this part and the income from the property shall be exempt from all state, county and municipal taxation except for inheritance, transfer and estate taxes, and except as otherwise provided in this code.

Acts 1988, ch. 750, § 29.

7-51-910. Contracts for purchase of natural gas, propane gas or electric power.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, any contract for the purchase for resale or municipal use of natural gas, propane gas or electric power may be made without complying with competitive bidding requirements.

Acts 1993, ch. 232, § 2; 1999, ch. 345, § 25.

7-51-911. Contracts for purchase of gasoline and diesel fuel.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a municipality may, with the approval of its governing body, enter into a negotiated contract or contracts, including a joint contract or contracts, with other municipalities, with a bank, investment bank or other similar financial institution for the purpose of stabilizing the net expense of the municipality incurred in the purchase of gasoline, diesel or both gasoline and diesel fuel actually purchased by the municipality. Any contract entered into under this section must be for a term of no more than twenty-four (24) months. The authority granted under this section is in addition to, and supplemental to, any existing authority granted a municipality under any other law.

Acts 2008, ch. 1088, § 1; 2009, ch. 107, § 1; 2010, ch. 897, § 1.